tr: Kenar Stili: Eğimli; Küt; Gevşek; Deveboynu; Kare; Diğer
nb: Kantstil: Fasede; Bullnose; Lettet; Ogee; Firkantet; Annet
de: Kantenstil: Abgeschrägt; Abgerundet; Abgestumpft; Kielbogen; Quadrat; Sonstiges
cs: Styl zakončení pracovní desky: Zkosený; Zaoblený; Uvolněný; Esovitý; Čtvercová; Jiné
zh-TW: 邊緣樣式: 斜角; 外圓角; 微倒角; S 形曲線; 方頭; 其他
sk-SK: Tvar hrany: Skosený; Polkruhový; Zaoblený; Ogee; Hranatý; Iné
fr: Style de contour: Biseauté; Arrondi; Assoupli; Doucine; Carré; Autre
ja: エッジスタイル: 傾斜; 丸面; 緩傾斜; オジー; スクエア; その他
bg-BG: Стил на ръба: Скосен; Bullnose; Eased; Оги; Квадратен; Други
sv: Kantstil: Fasad; Bullnose; Lättad; Ogee; Fyrkantig; Övrigt
es: Estilo de borde: Biselado; Redondeado; Bisel simple; Ojival; Cuadrado; Otros
el: Στυλ άκρης: Λοξευμένη; Στογγυλεμένη; Χαλαρή; Αψίδα; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
pl: Styl krawędzi: Ukośny; Nosek; Ułatwiony; Ośli grzbiet; Kwadrat; Inne
vi: Kiểu cạnh mép: Vát; Góc tròn; Nới; Đường xoi; Mũi giày vuông; Khác
ko: 가장자리 스타일: 경사; 불노즈; 완화됨; 반곡선; 스퀘어; 기타
th: สไตล์ขอบ: แบบเอียง; แบบบูลโนส; แบบมน; Ogee; ทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Izgled ruba: Ukošeni; Zaobljeni; Jednostavni; Ogee; Kvadratni; Ostalo
sl-SI: Slog roba: Poševen; Zaobljen; Posneto; Ogee; Kvadraten; Drugo
ro-RO: Stil margine: Conici; Muchie rotunjită; Muchie pătrată ușor rotunjită; Ogivă; Pătrată; Altele
hu: Szél stílusa: Ferde; Lekerekített; Könnyített; Szegélyes; Szögletes; Egyéb
it: Stile del bordo: Smussato; Arrotondato; Alleggerito; Ogivale; Quadrato; Altro
zh-CN: 边缘款式: 有斜面; 外圆角; 圆角; 弯曲 S 角; 方形; 其他
lt-LT: Krašto stilius: Nuožulnus; Užapvalintas; Kampuotas; S pavidalo; Kvadratinis; Kita
pt-PT: Estilo do canto: Com chanfradura; Bullnose; Facilitado; Ogival; Quadrado; Outro
fi: Reunan tyyli: Viistottu; Puolipyöreä; Pyöristetty 90-asteen kulma; Ogee; Neliömäinen; Muu
en: Edge style: Beveled; Bullnose; Eased; Ogee; Square; Other
ru: Форма кромки: Скошенные; Булавка; Облегченные; S-образные; Квадратные; Другой
pt-BR: Estilo de borda: Chanfrada; Arredondada; Com quinas arredondadas; Em forma de S; Quadrado; Outro
da: Kantstil: Affaset; Bullnose; Lettet; Ogee; Firkant; Andet
nl: Keustijl: Afgeschuind; Zonder neus; Versoepeld; Ogief; Vierkant; Andere